Maryland, session 2026, HB0509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
13–237.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “UTILITY COMPANY” MEANS:
(1) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE PUBLIC
UTILITIES ARTICLE; OR
(2) A GAS COMPANY, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE PUBLIC
UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A UTILITY COMPANY DOING BUSINESS
IN THE STATE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0509*

HOUSE BILL 509
(C) A UTILITY COMPANY MAY NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, MAKE A
CONTRIBUTION TO:
(1) THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY OF A CANDIDATE FOR A
NONFEDERAL PUBLIC OFFICE IN THE STATE; OR
(2) ANY OTHER CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY ORGANIZED IN SUPPORT
OF A CANDIDATE FOR A NONFEDERAL PUBLIC OFFICE IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.